src/tokenizer.xfst
! This tokenizer is based on work by
!  - StandardTokenizerImpl by the Lucene project
!    under the Apache License
!  - https://github.com/dlwh/epic by David Hall (2014)
!    under the Apacahe License
!  - KorAPTokenizerImpl.jflex by Marc Kupietz (2016)
!    under the Apache License
!  - https://github.com/coltekin/TRmorph/tokenize.xfst by Çağrı Çöltekin (2011-2015)
!    under the MIT License
!
! The abbreviation list is part of the sentence splitter tool
! of the IDS.

define NLout "@_TOKEN_SYMBOL_@";
! define NLout "\u000a";

define Digit [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9];
define AsciiLetter [a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z];
define HexLetter [Digit|a|A|b|B|c|C|d|D|e|E|f|F];
define EOT "\u0004";

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! <from tmorph> !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
define WS [" "|"\u0009"|"\u00a0"|"\u1680"|
           "\u2000"|"\u2001"|"\u2002"|"\u2003"|"\u2004"|"\u2005"| 
           "\u2006"|"\u2007"|"\u2008"|"\u2009"|"\u200a"|
           "\u202f"|"\u205f"|"\u3000"];

define NL ["\u000a"|"\u000b"|"\u000c"|"\u000d"|"\u0085"|"\u2028"|"\u2029"|EOT];

! Punctuation that ends sentences
! Differs!
define SP [["."|"?"|"!"]+|"…"];

! Left punctuation
define LP ["("|"["|"{"|
           "“"|"‘"|"‹"|"«"|
           "'"|%"|
           ! differs
           ["'" "'"] |
           "*"|"/"|"_"| ! Can be Markdown
           ! from book
           [%, %,]];

! Right punctuation - excluding the characters that can be used as apostrophe
define RP [SP|","|";"|":"|
              ")"|"]"|"}"|
              "”"|"›"|"»"|%"|[%’ %’]|["'" "'"]|[%‘ %‘]|
              "*"|"/"|"_"]; ! Can be Markdown

define Sym ["-"|"+"|"<"|">"|"*"|"/"|%=|%@|%&];
define Apos %'|%’|%`;
define Punct [LP|RP|Sym];
!define nonSym \[WS|LP|RP|Sym];
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! </from tmorph> !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define Emdash [%- %- (%-)+ | ["\u2014"|"\u2015"|"\u2e3a"|"\u2e3b"|"\ufe58"]+];
define Dash ["-"|"\u2011"|"\u2012"|"\u2013"|"\u2e1a"|"\ufe63"|"\uff0d"];
define Slash ["⁄"|"∕"|"／"|"/"];
define Asterisk ["*"];

define Char \[WS|NL|Punct|Apos]; ! |¨;

define Word Char+ ([Apos|Asterisk] Char+)* ([s|S] [%’|%`]);

define Plusampersand @txt"txt/plusampersand.txt";
define Word [Plusampersand | Word] (Dash [Plusampersand | Word])*;


define URLChar [Char|[Sym - ["<"|">"|%"]]];
!define Alpha ["a"|"b"|"c"|"d"|"e"|"f"|"g"|"h"|"i"|"j"|"k"|"l"|"m"|"n"|"o"|"p"|"q"|"r"|"s"|"t"|"u"|"v"|"w"|"x"|"y"|"z"|"_"];

define Caseinsensitive [
a (->) A,
b (->) B,
c (->) C,
d (->) D,
e (->) E,
f (->) F,
g (->) G,
h (->) H,
i (->) I,
j (->) J,
k (->) K,
l (->) L,
m (->) M,
n (->) N,
o (->) O,
p (->) P,
q (->) Q,
r (->) R,
s (->) S,
t (->) T,
u (->) U,
v (->) V,
w (->) W,
x (->) X,
y (->) Y,
z (->) Z,
ö (->) Ö,
ü (->) Ü,
ä (->) Ä,
ß (->) {SS}
];

define Letter [ [ AsciiLetter | ö | ü | ä | ß ] .o. Caseinsensitive ];

! Abbreviations and Initials
define Abbr [ @txt"txt/abbrv.txt" | Letter ] %.;

! A solution to the "(author): problem" may be to add ) at the end of any
! string as a possible ending

define Years ["(" Digit+ (".") ")"] | ["[" Digit+ (".") "]"];

! 20:00 Uhr, 00:12:25,34 Minuten
define Times [ ( [%0|1|2|3|4|5] ) Digit [ ":" [%0|1|2|3|4|5] Digit ]^{1,2} ( "," [ Digit ]^{1,3} ) ];

source emoticons.xfst
define Emoticons;

! acronyms: U.S.A., I.B.M., etc.
! use a post-filter to remove dots
define AcronymDep Letter %. Letter %. [Letter %.]+;

define Dot "."|[["["|"("] "d" "o" "t" [")"|"]"]] .o. Caseinsensitive;
define At "@"|[["["|"("] "a" "t" [")"|"]"]] .o. Caseinsensitive;

define TldEnd [{org}|{de}|{com}] .o. Caseinsensitive;

! Very relaxed URL scheme, not based on the strict Lucene implementation
define URL [ [ [{http} (s) | {ftp} | {file}] ":" "/" "/"] | [{www} Dot] ]
URLChar [URLChar|SP]* URLChar
.o. Caseinsensitive;

define Domain Char+ [Dash Char+]* Dot TldEnd;

! XML sources
source xml.xfst
define XML;

! XML entities
source entities.xfst
define XMLEntities;


! Email addresses
define Email URLChar+ At URLChar+ [Dot URLChar+]+;

! Twitter user, hashtag, Google+
define SNS ["@"|"#"|"+"] Char+;

define FileEnd [
                [{htm} ("l")]|
                [{doc} ("x")]|
                {pdf}|
                ["j" "p" ("e") "g"]|
                ["m" "p" ["3"|"4"]]|
                {ogg}|
                {png}|
                [{ppt} ("x")]|
                {avi}|
                {txt}|
                {xls}|
                {xml}|
                {aac}|
                {gif}|
                {exe}
                ] .o. Caseinsensitive;

define File (( AsciiLetter ":" %\ | "/" ) [ Char | "_" | "-" | Char [ %\ | "/" ] ]*) [Char | "-" | "_" ]+ "." FileEnd;

define Streetname Word {str} %.;

! Also supports
!   19.4.2015, 19/4/2015 etc.
define DigitPunct ["_"|"-"|"."|","|Slash];
define Num Digit+ [DigitPunct Digit+]* (Char+);

! ordinals
define Ord Digit ( Digit (Digit) ) %.;

! TODO:
!   floating point, serial, model numbers, ip addresses, etc.
!   every other segment must have at least one digit

! Omission words like "fu**ing!"
define Omission Char+ Asterisk Asterisk+ Char*;


! TODO: Name words with ' and `

! Support ASCII elements, like
! +---------------+
! <---->, -->, <--
!       +---------------+
! <---> | Worker Node N |
!       +---------------+
! |============= Core =============|


echo - Compile Real Token

define RealToken [Punct|Emdash|Abbr|Streetname|Word|SNS|AcronymDep|Ord|Num|Years|Times|XMLEntities|Omission];

echo - Introduce Token splitter

define Token [
  RealToken @-> ... NLout,
  XML @-> ... NLout,
  URL @-> ... NLout,
  Email @-> ... NLout,
  File @-> ... NLout,
  Domain @-> ... NLout,
  Emoticons @-> ... NLout
];

echo - Introduce Sentence splitter
! And compose Whitespace ignorance

define DQuotes ["”"|%"|"»"|"«"];
define NotSmallCaps [? - a - b - c - d - e - f - g - h - i - j - k - l - m - n - o - p - q - r - s - t - u - v - w - x - y - z - ü - ö - ä];

read regex Token .o. [
  SP NLout [DQuotes | "›" (NLout DQuotes) | %‹ (NLout DQuotes) | %’ (NLout DQuotes) | "'" (NLout DQuotes) | ")" ] (NLout SP) @-> ... NLout \/ _ NLout \%,
] .o. [
  SP @-> ... NLout \/ NLout _ NLout [? - "”" - %" - "»" - "«" - "›" - %‹ - %’ - "'" - ")" - NLout]
] .o. [
  [%. %. %.] @-> ... NLout \/ _ NLout WS+ NotSmallCaps
] .o. [
  [WS|NL]+ @-> 0 || [ .#. | NLout ] _
];

! foma -e "source tokenizer.xfst" -q -s && cat text.txt | flookup tokenizer.fst -x -b
